Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4836.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Laws 2025, First Special Session chapter 4, article 5, section 1, the effective date, is amended to read: EFFECTIVE DATE. This section is effective August 1, deleted text begin 2026deleted text end new text begin 2028new text end . Sec. 2. Laws 2025, First Special Session chapter 4, article 5, section 2, the effective date, is amended to read: EFFECTIVE DATE. This section is effective August 1, deleted text begin 2026deleted text end new text begin 2028new text end . Sec. 3. Laws 2025, First Special Session chapter 4, article 5, section 3, the effective date, is amended to read: EFFECTIVE DATE. This section is effective August 1, deleted text begin 2026deleted text end new text begin 2028new text end . Sec. 4. Laws 2025, First Special Session chapter 4, article 5, section 4, the effective date, is amended to read: EFFECTIVE DATE. This section is effective August 1, deleted text begin 2026deleted text end new text begin 2028new text end . Sec. 5. Laws 2025, First Special Session chapter 4, article 5, section 5, the effective date, is amended to read: EFFECTIVE DATE. This section is effective August 1, deleted text begin 2026deleted text end new text begin 2028new text end . Sec. 6. Laws 2025, First Special Session chapter 4, article 5, section 6, the effective date, is amended to read: EFFECTIVE DATE. This section is effective August 1, deleted text begin 2026deleted text end new text begin 2028new text end . Sec. 7. Laws 2025, First Special Session chapter 4, article 5, section 7, the effective date, is amended to read: EFFECTIVE DATE. This section is effective August 1, deleted text begin 2026deleted text end new text begin 2028new text end . Sec. 8. Laws 2025, First Special Session chapter 4, article 5, section 8, the effective date, is amended to read: EFFECTIVE DATE. This section is effective August 1, deleted text begin 2026deleted text end new text begin 2028new text end . Sec. 9. Laws 2025, First Special Session chapter 4, article 5, section 9, the effective date, is amended to read: EFFECTIVE DATE. This section is effective August 1, deleted text begin 2026deleted text end new text begin 2028new text end . Sec. 10. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE.new text end new text begin This act is effective July 1, 2026. new text end